Delaware, session 153, HB14.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE (Two-thirds of all members elected to each house thereof concurring therein): Section 1. Amend Article I of the Delaware Constitution by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 22. Right of individual privacy. The right of individual privacy is essential to the well-being of a free society and may not be infringed without a showing of a compelling state interest.